Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1404.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 23-1062, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE23-1062. Medical, surgical, hospital benefits; translation services; travel expenses; commencement of compensation; method of compensation A. Promptly, on notice to the employer, every injured employee shall receive medical, surgical and hospital benefits or other treatment, nursing, medicine, surgical supplies, crutches and other apparatus, including artificial members, reasonably required at the time of the injury, and during the period of disability. Such benefits shall be termed "medical, surgical and hospital benefits".  For the purposes of this subsection and except as provided in section 23-1070, an injured employee may choose all of the following that are related to medical, surgical and hospital benefits: 1. The medical provider. 2. The pharmacy that provides prescription drugs. 3. An ancillary service that includes: (a) Laboratory services. (b) Imaging services. (c) Durable medical equipment. B. Medical, surgical and hospital benefits include translation services, if needed.  A carrier, self-insurance pool or employer that does not direct care pursuant to section 23-1070 may choose the translator if the translator is certified by an outside agency and is not an employee of the carrier, self-insurance pool or employer. If the carrier, self-insurance pool or employer is unable to locate a certified translator for the particular language or dialect needed, the parties may agree on a translator who is not a certified translator. C. Compensation for medical, surgical and hospital benefits shall include reimbursement for reasonable travel expenses if the employee must travel more than twenty-five miles from the employee's place of residence to obtain medical care for the injury. D. The first installment of compensation is to be paid no not later than the twenty-first day after written notification by the commission to the carrier of the filing of a claim unless the right to compensation is denied. Thereafter, compensation shall be paid at least once each two weeks during the period of temporary total disability and at least monthly thereafter. Compensation shall not be paid for the first seven days after the injury. If the incapacity extends beyond the period of seven days, compensation shall begin on the eighth day after the injury, but if the disability continues for one week beyond such seven days, compensation shall be computed from the date of the injury. E. Compensation shall be made by negotiable instrument, payable immediately on demand or, at the election of the employee and if offered by the employer or carrier, by another commonly accepted method for transferring money by banking institutions, including electronic fund transfers to the employee's account or a prepaid debit card account that is established for the purpose of making direct electronic payment to the employee. END_STATUTE